Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.675

Inspection of properties—Oaths, subpoenas, witnesses, depositions.

In the discharge of any duty imposed under this chapter, the rules review committee may examine and inspect all properties, equipment, facilities, files, records, and accounts of any state office, department, institution, board, committee, commission, or agency, and administer oaths, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of any papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony, and cause the deposition of witnesses, either residing within or without the state, to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for taking depositions in civil actions in the superior courts.

[ 1995 c 403 s 506.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.